ko: 주 사용 손: 양쪽; 왼쪽; 오른쪽; 기타
sv: Handsida: Båda sidor; Vänster; Höger; Övrigt
hu: Melyik kéz: Mindkét oldal; Bal oldal; Jobb oldal; Egyéb
da: Håndside: Begge sider; Venstre; Højre; Andet
el: Πλευρά χρήσης χεριού: Και οι δύο πλευρές; Αριστερά; Δικαίωμα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Lado da mão: Ambos os lados; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
sk-SK: Typ laterality: Obe strany; Vľavo; Vpravo; Iné
nl: Handzijde: Tweezijdig; Links; Rechts; Andere
es: Lado: Ambos lados; Izquierda; Derecha; Otros
sl-SI: Stran roke: Obe strani; Leva; Desna; Drugo
de: Handseite: Beide Seiten; Links; Rechts; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Ръка: И двете страни; Лява; Дясна; Други
zh-CN: 哪侧手: 双手; 左; 右; 其他
ro-RO: Mână: Ambele părți; Stânga; Corect; Altele
pl: Strona: Obie strony; Lewy; Prawy; Inne
en: Hand side: Both sides; Left; Right; Other
zh-TW: 側翻邊: 兩側通用; 左; 右; 其他
fi: Kämmenpuoli: Molemmin puolin; Vasen; Oikea; Muu
ru: Назначение для правой или левой руки: Обе стороны; Слева; Справа; Другое
th: ด้าน: สองข้าง; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านขวา; อื่นๆ
nb: Håndside: Begge sider; Venstre; Høyre; Annet
vi: Phía tay: Cả hai phía; Trái; Phải; Khác
cs: Strana: Obě strany; Levá strana; Pravá strana; Jiné
hr-HR: Dominantna ruka: Obje strane; Lijeva; Desna; Ostalo
lt-LT: Ranka: Dvipusė; Kairė; Dešinė; Kita
tr: El Tarafı: İki taraf; Sol; Sağ; Diğer
fr: Côté: Deux côtés; Gauche; Droite; Autre
it: Lato della presa: Entrambi i lati; A sinistra; A destra; Altro
pt-PT: Lado da mão: Ambos os lados; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
ja: 利き手側: 両側; 左; 右; その他